Vermont statutes. Title 24 Municipal and County Government
Subchapter 6. Curfew

§ 2151.
Child welfare.

A municipality may make regulations respecting children under 16 years of age who are allowed to loiter in the streets or other public places.
Such regulations shall be conducive to their welfare and to the public good.
Such municipality may fix a penalty of not more than $5.00 for each violation of such regulations to be recovered against the person having the custody of such child in a civil action on this statute.